California statutes. Public Utilities Code
(B) The electrical corporation may request the determination specified in subparagraph (A) by the commission in a separate proceeding or in an existing proceeding or both. If the commission makes the determination specified in subparagraph (A), the commission shall establish, as part of the financing order, a procedure for the electrical corporation to submit applications from time to time to request the issuance of additional financing orders designating fixed recovery charges and any associated fixed recovery tax amounts as recoverable. The electrical corporation may submit an application with respect to recovery costs that an electrical corporation (i) has paid, (ii) has an existing legal obligation to pay, or (iii) would be obligated to pay pursuant to an executed settlement agreement. The
 commission shall, within 180 days of the filing of that application, issue a financing order, which may take the form of a resolution, if the commission determines that the amounts identified in the application are recovery costs.

(2) Fixed recovery charges and any associated fixed recovery tax amounts shall be imposed only on existing and future consumers in the service territory. Consumers within the service territory shall continue to pay fixed recovery charges and any associated fixed recovery tax amounts until the recovery bonds and associated financing costs are paid in full by the financing entity.

(3) An electrical corporation may exercise the same rights and remedies under its tariff and applicable law and regulation based upon a consumer’s nonpayment of fixed recovery charges and any associated fixed recovery tax as it could for a consumer’s failure to pay any other
 charge payable to that electrical corporation.

(b) The commission may establish in a financing order an effective mechanism that ensures recovery of recovery costs through nonbypassable fixed recovery charges and any associated fixed recovery tax amounts from existing and future consumers in the service territory, and those consumers shall be required to pay those charges until the recovery bonds and all associated financing costs are paid in full by the financing entity, at which time those charges shall be terminated. Fixed recovery charges shall be irrevocable, notwithstanding the true-up adjustment pursuant to subdivision (g).

(c) Recovery bonds authorized by the commission’s financing orders may be issued in one or more series on or before December 31, 2035.

(d) The commission shall issue financing orders in
 accordance with this article to facilitate the recovery, financing, or refinancing of recovery costs. A financing order may be adopted only upon the application of the electrical corporation and shall become effective in accordance with its terms only after the electrical corporation files with the commission the electrical corporation’s written consent to all terms and conditions of the financing order. A financing order may specify how amounts collected from a consumer shall be allocated between fixed recovery charges, any associated fixed recovery tax amounts, and other charges.

(e) Notwithstanding Section 455.5 or 1708, or any other law, and except as otherwise provided in subdivision (g), with respect to recovery property that has been made the basis for the issuance of recovery bonds and with respect to any associated fixed recovery tax amounts, the financing order, the fixed recovery charges, and any associated fixed recovery tax amounts
 shall be irrevocable. The commission shall not, either by rescinding, altering, or amending the financing order or otherwise, revalue or revise for ratemaking purposes the recovery costs or the costs of recovering, financing, or refinancing the recovery costs, in any way reduce or impair the value of recovery property or of the right to receive any associated fixed recovery tax amounts either directly or indirectly by taking fixed recovery charges or any associated fixed recovery tax amounts into account when setting other rates for the electrical corporation or when setting charges for the Department of Water Resources. The amount of revenues shall not be subject to reduction, impairment, postponement, or termination. The State of California does hereby pledge and agree with the electrical corporation, owners of recovery property, financing entities, and holders of recovery bonds that the state shall neither limit nor alter, except as otherwise provided with respect to the true-up adjustment of the fixed
 recovery charges pursuant to subdivision (i), the fixed recovery charges, any associated fixed recovery tax amounts, recovery property, financing orders, or any rights under a financing order until the recovery bonds, together with the interest on the recovery bonds and associated financing costs, are fully paid and discharged, and any associated fixed recovery tax amounts have been satisfied or, in the alternative, have been refinanced through an additional issue of recovery bonds, provided that nothing contained in this section shall preclude the limitation or alteration if and when adequate provision shall be made by law for the protection of the electrical corporation and of owners and holders of the recovery bonds. The financing entity is authorized to include this pledge and undertaking for the state in these recovery bonds. When setting other rates for the electrical corporation, nothing in this subdivision shall prevent the commission from taking into account either of the following:

(1) Any collection of fixed recovery charges in excess of amounts actually required to pay recovery costs financed or refinanced by recovery bonds.

(2) Any collection of fixed recovery tax amounts in excess of amounts actually required to pay federal and State of California income and franchise taxes associated with fixed recovery charges, provided that this would not result in a recharacterization of the tax, accounting, and other intended characteristics of the financing, including, but not limited to, either of the following:

(A) Treating the recovery bonds as debt of the electrical corporation or its affiliates for federal income tax purposes.

(B) Treating the transfer of the recovery property by the electrical corporation as a true sale for bankruptcy
 purposes.

(f) (1) Neither financing orders nor recovery bonds issued under this article shall constitute a debt or liability of the state or of any political subdivision thereof, nor shall they constitute a pledge of the full faith and credit of the state or any of its political subdivisions, but are payable solely from the funds provided therefor under this article and shall be consistent with Sections 1 and 18 of Article XVI of the California Constitution. All recovery bonds shall contain on the face thereof a statement to the following effect: “Neither the full faith and credit nor the taxing power of the State of California is pledged to the payment of the principal of, or interest on, this bond.”

(2) The issuance of recovery bonds under this article shall not directly, indirectly, or contingently obligate the state or any political subdivision thereof to
 levy or to pledge any form of taxation therefor or to make any appropriation for their payment.

(g) The commission shall establish procedures for the expeditious processing of an application for a financing order, which shall provide for the approval or disapproval of the application within 120 days of the application. Any fixed recovery charge authorized by a financing order shall appear on consumer bills. The commission shall, in any financing order, provide for a procedure for periodic true-up adjustments to fixed recovery charges, which shall be made at least annually and may be made more frequently. The electrical corporation shall file an application with the commission to implement any true-up adjustment.

(h) Fixed recovery charges are recovery property when, and to the extent that, a financing order authorizing the fixed recovery charges has become effective in accordance
 with this article, and the recovery property shall thereafter continuously exist as property for all purposes, and all of the rights and privileges relating to that property accorded by this article shall continuously exist for the period and to the extent provided in the financing order, but in any event until the recovery bonds are paid in full, including all principal, premiums, if any, and interest with respect to the recovery bonds, and all associated financing costs are paid in full. A financing order may provide that the creation of recovery property shall be simultaneous with the sale of the recovery property to a transferee or assignee as provided in the application of the pledge of the recovery property to secure the recovery bonds.

(i) Recovery costs shall not be imposed upon customers participating in the California Alternative Rates for Energy or Family Electric Rate Assistance programs discount pursuant to Section 739.1.

(j) Any successor to a financing entity shall be bound by the requirements of this article and shall perform and satisfy all obligations of, and have the same rights under a financing order as and to the same extent as, the financing entity, including the obligation to collect and pay energy transition revenues to persons entitled to receive the revenues.

(k) This article and any financing order made pursuant to this article do not amend, reduce, modify, or otherwise affect the right of the Department of Water Resources to recover its revenue requirements and to receive the charges that it is to recover and receive pursuant to Division 27 (commencing with Section 80000) and Division 28 (commencing with Section 80500) of the Water Code, or pursuant to any agreement entered into by the commission and the Department of Water Resources pursuant to the applicable
 division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 119, Sec. 34.   (SB 254)   Effective September 19, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

850.2.

(a) The financing entity may issue recovery bonds upon approval by the commission in a financing order. Recovery bonds shall be nonrecourse to the credit or any assets of the electrical corporation, other than the recovery property as specified in that financing order.

(b) The electrical corporation may sell and assign all or portions of its interest in recovery property to one or more financing entities that make that recovery property the basis for issuance of recovery bonds, to the extent approved in a financing order. The electrical corporation or financing entity may pledge recovery property as collateral, directly or indirectly, for recovery bonds to the extent approved in the pertinent financing orders providing for a security interest
 in the recovery property, in the manner set forth in Section 850.3. In addition, recovery property may be sold or assigned by either of the following: (1) the financing entity or a trustee for the holders of recovery bonds or the holders of an ancillary agreement in connection with the exercise of remedies upon a default, or (2) any person acquiring the recovery property after a sale or assignment pursuant to this article.

(c) To the extent that any interest in recovery property is sold, assigned, or is pledged as collateral pursuant to subdivision (b), the commission shall authorize the electrical corporation to contract with the financing entity that it will continue to operate its system to provide service to consumers within its service territory, will collect amounts in respect of the fixed recovery charges for the benefit and account of the financing entity, and will account for and remit these amounts to or for the account of the
 financing entity. Contracting with the financing entity in accordance with that authorization shall not impair or negate the characterization of the sale, assignment, or pledge as an absolute transfer, a true sale, or a security interest, as applicable. To the extent that billing, collection, and other related services with respect to the provision of electric service are provided to a consumer by any person or entity other than the electrical corporation in whose service territory the consumer is located, that person or entity shall collect the fixed recovery charges and any associated fixed recovery tax amounts from the consumer for the benefit and account of the electrical corporation or financing entity with the associated revenues remitted solely for the benefit and repayment of the recovery bonds and associated financing costs as a condition to the provision of electric service to that consumer. Each financing order shall impose terms and conditions, consistent with the purposes and objectives of this
 article, on any person or entity responsible for billing, collection, and other related services, including, without limitation, collection of the fixed recovery charges and any associated fixed recovery tax amounts, that are the subject of the financing order.

(d) Recovery property that is specified in a financing order shall constitute an existing, present property right, notwithstanding the fact that the imposition and collection of fixed recovery charges depend on the electrical corporation continuing to provide electricity service or continuing to perform its servicing functions relating to the collection of fixed recovery charges or on the level of future electricity consumption. Recovery property shall exist whether or not the fixed recovery charges have been billed, have accrued, or have been collected and notwithstanding the fact that the value for a security interest in the recovery property, or amount of the recovery property, is
 dependent on the future provision of service to consumers. All recovery property specified in a financing order shall continue to exist until the recovery bonds issued pursuant to a financing order and all associated financing costs are paid in full.

(e) Recovery property, fixed recovery charges, and the interests of an assignee, bondholder or financing entity, or any pledgee in recovery property and fixed recovery charges are not subject to setoff, counterclaim, surcharge, recoupment, or defense by the electrical corporation or any other person or in connection with the bankruptcy, reorganization, or other insolvency proceeding of the electrical corporation, any affiliate of the electrical corporation, or any other entity.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 1708 or any other law, any requirement under this article or a financing order that the commission take action with respect to the
 subject matter of a financing order shall be binding upon the commission, as it may be constituted from time to time, and any successor agency exercising functions similar to the commission, and the commission shall have no authority to rescind, alter, or amend that requirement in a financing order. The approval by the commission in a financing order of the issuance by the electrical corporation or a financing entity of recovery bonds shall include the approvals, if any, as may be required by Article 5 (commencing with Section 816) and Section 701.5. Nothing in Section 701.5 shall be construed to prohibit the issuance of recovery bonds upon the terms and conditions as may be approved by the commission in a financing order. Section 851 is not applicable to the transfer or pledge of recovery property, the issuance of recovery bonds, or related transactions approved in a financing order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 626, Sec. 32.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

850.3.

(a) A security interest in recovery property is valid, is enforceable against the pledgor and third parties, is subject to the rights of any third parties holding security interests in the recovery property perfected in the manner described in this section, and attaches when all of the following have taken place:

(1) The commission has issued a financing order authorizing the fixed recovery charges included in the recovery property.

(2) Value has been given by the pledgees of the recovery property.

(3) The pledgor has signed a security agreement covering the recovery property.

(b) A valid and enforceable security interest in recovery property is perfected when it has attached and when a financing statement has been filed in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9501) of Division 9 of the Commercial Code naming the pledgor of the recovery property as “debtor” and identifying the recovery property. Any description of the recovery property shall be sufficient if it refers to the financing order creating the recovery property. A copy of the financing statement shall be filed with the commission by the electrical corporation that is the pledgor or transferor of the recovery property, and the commission may require the electrical corporation to make other filings with respect to the security interest in accordance with procedures it may establish, provided that the filings shall not affect the perfection of the security interest.

(c) A perfected
 security interest in recovery property is a continuously perfected security interest in all recovery property revenues and proceeds arising with respect thereto, whether or not the revenues or proceeds have accrued. Conflicting security interests shall rank according to priority in time of perfection. Recovery property shall constitute property for all purposes, including for contracts securing recovery bonds, whether or not the recovery property revenues and proceeds have accrued.

(d) Subject to the terms of the security agreement covering the recovery property and the rights of any third parties holding security interests in the recovery property perfected in the manner described in this section, the validity and relative priority of a security interest created under this section is not defeated or adversely affected by the commingling of revenues arising with respect to the recovery property with other funds of the electrical corporation
 that is the pledgor or transferor of the recovery property, or by any security interest in a deposit account of that electrical corporation perfected under Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Commercial Code into which the revenues are deposited. Subject to the terms of the security agreement, upon compliance with the requirements of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 9312 of the Commercial Code, the pledgees of the recovery property shall have a perfected security interest in all cash and deposit accounts of the electrical corporation in which recovery property revenues have been commingled with other funds, but the perfected security interest shall be limited to an amount not greater than the amount of the recovery property revenues received by the electrical corporation within 12 months before (1) any default under the security agreement or (2) the institution of insolvency proceedings by or against the electrical corporation, less payments from the revenues to the pledgees during
 that 12-month period.

(e) If default occurs under the security agreement covering the recovery property, the pledgees of the recovery property, subject to the terms of the security agreement, shall have all rights and remedies of a secured party upon default under Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Commercial Code, and are entitled to foreclose or otherwise enforce their security interest in the recovery property, subject to the rights of any third parties holding prior security interests in the recovery property perfected in the manner provided in this section. In addition, the commission may require in the financing order creating the recovery property that, in the event of default by the electrical corporation in payment of recovery property revenues, the commission and any successor thereto, upon the application by the pledgees or transferees, including transferees under Section 850.4, of the recovery property, and without
 limiting any other remedies available to the pledgees or transferees by reason of the default, shall order the sequestration and payment to the pledgees or transferees of recovery property revenues. Any order shall remain in full force and effect notwithstanding any bankruptcy, reorganization, or other insolvency proceedings with respect to the debtor, pledgor, or transferor of the recovery property. Any surplus in excess of amounts necessary to pay principal, premiums, if any, interest, costs, and arrearages on the recovery bonds, and associated financing costs arising under the security agreement, shall be remitted to the debtor or to the pledgor or transferor.

(f) Section 5451 of the Government Code shall not apply to any pledge of recovery property by a financing entity. Sections 9204 and 9205 of the Commercial Code apply to a pledge of recovery property by the electrical corporation, an affiliate of the electrical corporation, or a
 financing entity.

(g) This section sets forth the terms by which a consensual security interest shall be created and perfected in the recovery property. Unless otherwise ordered by the commission with respect to any series of recovery bonds on or prior to the issuance of the series, there shall exist a statutory lien as provided in this subdivision. Upon the effective date of the financing order, there shall exist a first priority lien on all recovery property then existing or thereafter arising pursuant to the terms of the financing order. This lien shall arise by operation of this section automatically without any action on the part of the electrical corporation, any affiliate thereof, the financing entity, or any other person. This lien shall secure all obligations, then existing or subsequently arising, to the holders of the recovery bonds issued pursuant to the financing order, the trustee or representative for the holders, and any other
 entity specified in the financing order. The persons for whose benefit this lien is established shall, upon the occurrence of any defaults specified in the financing order, have all rights and remedies of a secured party upon default under Division 9 (commencing with Section 9101) of the Commercial Code, and are entitled to foreclose or otherwise enforce this statutory lien in the recovery property. This lien attaches to the recovery property regardless of who owns, or is subsequently determined to own, the recovery property, including the electrical corporation, any affiliate thereof, the financing entity, or any other person. This lien shall be valid, perfected, and enforceable against the owner of the recovery property and all third parties upon the effectiveness of the financing order without any further public notice; provided, however, that any person may, but is not required to, file a financing statement in accordance with subdivision (b). Financing statements so filed may be “protective filings” and
 are not evidence of the ownership of the recovery property.

A perfected statutory lien in recovery property is a continuously perfected lien in all recovery property revenues and proceeds, whether or not the revenues or proceeds have accrued. Conflicting liens shall rank according to priority in time of perfection. Recovery property shall constitute property for all purposes, including for contracts securing recovery bonds, whether or not the recovery property revenues and proceeds have accrued.

In addition, the commission may require, in the financing order creating the recovery property, that, in the event of default by the electrical corporation in the payment of recovery property revenues, the commission and any successor thereto, upon the application by the beneficiaries of the statutory lien, and without limiting any other remedies available to the beneficiaries by reason of the default, shall order the sequestration
 and payment to the beneficiaries of recovery property revenues. Any order shall remain in full force and effect notwithstanding any bankruptcy, reorganization, or other insolvency proceedings with respect to the debtor. Any surplus in excess of amounts necessary to pay principal, premiums, if any, interest, costs, and arrearages on the recovery bonds, and other costs arising in connection with the documents governing the recovery bonds, shall be remitted to the debtor.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 626, Sec. 32.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

850.4.

(a) A transfer of recovery property by the electrical corporation to an affiliate or to a financing entity, or by an affiliate of the electrical corporation or a financing entity to another financing entity, which the parties in the governing documentation have expressly stated to be a sale or other absolute transfer, in a transaction approved in a financing order, shall be treated as an absolute transfer of all of the transferor’s right, title, and interest, as in a true sale, and not as a pledge or other financing, of the recovery property, other than for federal and state income and franchise tax purposes.

(b) The characterization of the sale, assignment, or transfer as an absolute transfer and true sale and the corresponding
 characterization of the property interest of the purchaser shall not be affected or impaired by, among other things, the occurrence of any of the following:

(1) Commingling of fixed recovery charge revenues with other amounts.

(2) The retention by the seller of either of the following:

(A) A partial or residual interest, including an equity interest, in the financing entity or the recovery property, whether direct or indirect, subordinate or otherwise.

(B) The right to recover costs associated with taxes, franchise fees, or license fees imposed on the collection of fixed recovery charges.

(3) Any recourse that the purchaser may have against the seller.

(4) Any indemnification rights, obligations, or repurchase rights made or provided by the seller.

(5) The obligation of the seller to collect fixed recovery charges on behalf of an assignee.

(6) The treatment of the sale, assignment, or transfer for tax, financial reporting, or other purposes.

(7) Any true-up adjustment of the fixed recovery charges as provided in the financing order.

(c) A transfer of recovery property shall be deemed perfected against third persons when both of the following occur:

(1) The commission issues the financing order authorizing the fixed recovery charges included in the recovery property.

(2) An assignment of the recovery property in writing has been executed and delivered to the transferee.

(d) As between bona fide assignees of the same right for value without notice, the assignee first filing a financing statement in accordance with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 9501) of Division 9 of the Commercial Code naming the assignor of the recovery property as debtor and identifying the recovery property has priority. Any description of the recovery property shall be sufficient if it refers to the financing order creating the recovery property. A copy of the financing statement shall be filed by the assignee with the commission, and the commission may require the assignor or the assignee to make other filings with respect to the transfer in accordance with procedures it may establish, but these filings shall not affect the perfection of the transfer.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 626, Sec. 32.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

850.5.

Any successor to the electrical corporation, whether pursuant to any bankruptcy, reorganization, or other insolvency proceeding, or pursuant to any merger, sale, or transfer, by operation of law, or otherwise, shall perform and satisfy all obligations of the electrical corporation pursuant to this article in the same manner and to the same extent as the electrical corporation, including, but not limited to, collecting and paying to the holders of recovery bonds, or their representatives, or the applicable financing entity revenues arising with respect to the recovery property sold to the applicable financing entity or pledged to secure recovery bonds. Any successor to the electrical corporation is entitled to receive any fixed recovery tax amounts otherwise payable to the electrical corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 626, Sec. 32.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

850.6.

The authority of the commission to issue financing orders pursuant to Section 850.1 shall expire on December 31, 2035. The expiration of the authority shall have no effect upon financing orders adopted by the commission pursuant to this article or any recovery property arising therefrom, or upon the charges authorized to be levied thereunder, or the rights, interests, and obligations of the electrical corporation or a financing entity or holders of recovery bonds pursuant to the financing order, or the authority of the commission to monitor, supervise, or take further action with respect to the order in accordance with the terms of this article and of the order.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 626, Sec. 32.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

850.7.

(a) Notwithstanding subdivision (e) of Section 850.1, if, subsequent to the issuance of a financing order, an electrical corporation receives additional insurance proceeds, tax benefits, or other amounts that reimburse the electrical corporation for costs associated with catastrophic wildfire amounts included in the recovery costs addressed in that financing order, the electrical corporation shall credit customers, in a manner to be determined by the commission, with the net after tax amounts of those reimbursements, but the commission may not adjust, amend, or modify the catastrophic wildfire amounts, fixed recovery charges, the fixed recovery tax amounts, the financing order, recovery costs, the recovery property, or the recovery bonds.

(b) Nothing in this section shall be construed to permit setoff, counterclaim, surcharge, recoupment, or defense by the electrical corporation or any other person, or in connection with the bankruptcy, reorganization, or other insolvency proceeding of the electrical corporation, any affiliate of the electrical corporation, or any other entity, against the recovery property, the fixed recovery charges, or the interests of an assignee, bondholder, or financing entity, or any pledgee in recovery property or fixed recovery charges.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 626, Sec. 32.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

850.8.

This article shall not affect any civil action or proceeding.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 626, Sec. 32.   (SB 901)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 6. Transfer or Encumbrance of Utility Property [851. - 857.]

851.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (c), a public utility, other than a common carrier by railroad subject to Part A of the Interstate Commerce Act (49 U.S.C. Sec. 10101 et seq.), shall not sell, lease, assign, mortgage, or otherwise dispose of, or encumber the whole or any part of, its railroad, street railroad, line, plant, system, or other property necessary or useful in the performance of its duties to the public, or any franchise or permit or any right thereunder, or by any means whatsoever, directly or indirectly, merge or consolidate its railroad, street railroad, line, plant, system, or other property, or franchises or permits or any part thereof, without first having either secured an order from the commission authorizing it to do so for
 qualified transactions valued above five million dollars ($5,000,000), or for qualified transactions valued at five million dollars ($5,000,000) or less, filed an advice letter and obtained approval from the commission authorizing it to do so. If the advice letter is uncontested, approval may be given by the executive director or the director of the division of the commission having regulatory jurisdiction over the utility. The commission shall determine the types of transactions valued at five million dollars ($5,000,000) or less, that qualify for advice letter handling. For a qualified transaction valued at five million dollars ($5,000,000) or less, the commission may designate a procedure different than the advice letter procedure if it determines that the transaction warrants a more comprehensive review. Absent protest or incomplete documentation, the commission shall approve or deny the advice
 letter within 120 days of its filing by the applicant public utility. The commission shall reject any advice letter that seeks to circumvent the five-million-dollar ($5,000,000) threshold by dividing a single asset with a value of more than five million dollars ($5,000,000) into component parts, each valued at less than five million dollars ($5,000,000). Every sale, lease, assignment, mortgage, disposition, encumbrance, merger, or consolidation made other than in accordance with the advice letter and approval from the commission authorizing it is void. The permission and approval of the commission to the exercise of a franchise or permit under Article 1 (commencing with Section 1001) of Chapter 5, or the sale, lease, assignment, mortgage, or other disposition or encumbrance of a franchise or permit under this article, shall not revive or validate any lapsed or invalid franchise or permit, or enlarge
 or add to the powers or privileges contained in the grant of any franchise or permit, or waive any forfeiture.

(b) (1) Subdivision (a) shall apply to any transaction described in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 854.2.

(2) For any transaction described in subparagraph (F) of paragraph (1) of subdivision (b) of Section 854.2, as part of its review under subdivision (a), the commission shall determine whether the transaction is fair and reasonable to affected public utility employees, including both union and nonunion employees.

(c) (1) Subdivision (a) shall not apply to
 an easement, or a change to an easement, that has a ratepayer financial impact valued at one hundred thousand dollars ($100,000) or less if a public utility that is a party to the qualified transaction has gross annual California revenues of five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) or more.

(2) On January 1, 2030, and every five years thereafter, the threshold values specified in paragraph (1) shall be adjusted to reflect any increase in inflation as measured by the Consumer Price Index for All Urban Consumers (CPI-U) published by the United States Bureau of Labor Statistics. 

(3) Each public utility shall annually file a Tier 1 advice letter with the commission by April 1, with a report of all transactions performed pursuant to paragraph (1), enumerated by date, value, location, and party.

(d) This section does not prevent the sale, lease, encumbrance, or other disposition by any public utility of property that is not necessary or useful in the performance of its duties to the public, and any disposition of property by a public utility shall be conclusively presumed to be of property that is not useful or necessary in the performance of its duties to the public, as to any purchaser, lessee, or encumbrancer dealing with that property in good faith for value, provided that this section does not apply to the interchange of equipment in the regular course of transportation between connecting common carriers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 150, Sec. 1.   (AB 420)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

852.

No public utility, and no subsidiary or affiliate of, or corporation holding a controlling interest in, a public utility, shall purchase or acquire, take or hold, any part of the capital stock of any other public utility, organized or existing under or by virtue of the laws of this state, without having been first authorized to do so by the commission; provided, however, that the commission may establish by order or rule categories of stock acquisitions which it determines will not be harmful to the public interest, and purchases within those categories are exempt from this section. Every assignment, transfer, contract, or agreement for assignment or transfer of any stock by or through any person or corporation to any corporation or otherwise in violation of any of the provisions of this article is void and of no effect, and no such transfer shall be made on the books of any public utility. Nothing in this section prevents the holding of stock previously lawfully acquired.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1989, Ch. 390, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

853.

(a) This article does not apply to any person or corporation which transacts no business subject to regulation under this part, except performing services or delivering commodities for or to public utilities or municipal corporations or other public agencies primarily for resale or use in serving the public or any portion thereof, but shall apply to any public utility, and any subsidiary or affiliate of, or corporation holding a controlling interest in, a public utility, if the commission finds, in a proceeding to which the public utility is or may become a party, that the application of this article is required by the public interest.

(b) The commission may from time to time by order or rule, and subject to those terms and
 conditions as may be prescribed therein, exempt any public utility or class of public utility from this article if it finds that the application thereof with respect to the public utility or class of public utility is not necessary in the public interest. The commission may establish rules or impose requirements deemed necessary to protect the interest of the customers or subscribers of the public utility or class of public utility exempted under this subdivision. These rules or requirements may include, but are not limited to, notification of a proposed sale or transfer of assets or stock and provision for refunds or credits to customers or subscribers.

(c) The provisions of Sections 851 and 854 that prohibit any assignment, acquisition, or change of control without advance authorization from the commission, do not apply to the transfer of the ownership interest in a water utility, with 10,000 or fewer service connections, from a decedent to a
 member of the decedent’s family in the manner provided in Section 240 of the Probate Code or by a will, trust, or other instrument.

(d) It is the intent of the Legislature that transactions with monetary values that materially impact a public utility’s rate base should not qualify for expedited advice letter treatment pursuant to this article. It is the further intent of the Legislature that the commission maintain all of its oversight and review responsibilities subject to the California Environmental Quality Act, and that public utility transactions that jurisdictionally require a review by the commission, as the lead agency, under the act should not qualify for expedited advice letter treatment pursuant to this article. An advice letter may be filed for transactions by the public utility if the lead agency has completed the appropriate review under the California Environmental Quality Act for the transaction, and the commission is the
 responsible agency under the act. The advice letter shall be subject to approval by resolution voted upon by the commission.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2009, Ch. 370, Sec. 2.   (AB 698)   Effective January 1, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

853.2.
